Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2501XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 411 Section 1. Section 910.1, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. âPecuniary damagesâ means all damages to the extent not 3 paid by an insurer on an insurance claim by the victim, which 4 that a victim could recover against the offender in a civil 5 action arising out of the same facts or event, except punitive 6 damages and damages for pain, suffering, mental anguish, and 7 loss of consortium. Without limitation, âpecuniary damagesâ 8 includes damages for wrongful death and expenses incurred for 9 psychiatric or psychological services or counseling or other 10 counseling for the victim which that became necessary as a 11 direct result of the criminal activity. 12